src/fst/stems/particles.lexc
LEXICON Particle
ankaŭ   Part+tag; !'also'
ĉu      Part+tag; !'whether, or question particle'
eĉ      Part+tag; !'even'
ekde    Part+tag; !'since'
jam     Part+tag; !'already'
ke      Part+tag; !'that (relativizer)'
ktp     Part+tag; !"and so forth (like Latin 'etc.')""
laŭ     Part+tag; !'according to'
ne      Part+tag; !'not'
nun     Part+tag; !'now'
nur     Part+tag; !'only'
ol      Part+tag; !'than'
plej    Part+tag; !'(superlative) most'
pli     Part+tag; !'(comparative) more'
tre     Part+tag; !'very'

LEXICON Part+tag
+Particle:      #;
